Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 18

Massage Licensure Act of 1995

63-18-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Massage Licensure Act of 1995.”

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 2; T.C.A. § 63-18-201.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 63-18-101 — 63-18-114 (Acts 1979, ch. 431, §§ 1-14; T.C.A. §§ 63-1801 — 63-1813; Acts 1982, ch. 628, §§ 1-3; 1994, ch. 901, § 4), concerning massage registration, was repealed by Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 1, effective October 1, 1995. For new law, see this chapter. Former § 63-18-114 had been previously transferred to § 63-18-111(a)(5) in 1986.

Cross-References. Adult-oriented establishment registration, title 7, ch. 51, part 11.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Massage or exposure of erogenous areas prohibited, § 39-17-918.

Practice of aesthetics, § 62-4-102.

Attorney General Opinions. Advertising and treatment by massage therapists, OAG 95-033, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 27 (4/6/95).

Effect of this part (now chapter) on prior city or county ordinances regulating massage, OAG 96-028, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 18 (2/28/96).

A city ordinance which requires that massage operators or bathers obtain a permit before conducting a massage institute, bathhouse, or similar business in the city, does not apply to persons or establishments required to be licensed under the Massage Licensure Act of 1995, T.C.A. § 63-18-201, or who are otherwise regulated by law and, therefore, the ordinance does not violate the act, OAG 01-114, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 105 (7/16/01).

63-18-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the massage licensure board;

“Compensation” means the payment, loan, advance, donation, contribution, deposit or gift of money or anything of value;

“Massage/bodywork/somatic” means the manipulation of the soft tissues of the body with the intention of positively affecting the health and well being of the client;

“Massage establishment” means a place of business held out to the public wherein massage is practiced; and

“Massage therapist” means a person who practices massage for compensation and is licensed by the board.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 3; 1996, ch. 1059, § 1; 1997, ch. 130, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-18-202.

63-18-103. Tennessee massage licensure board.

There is hereby created the Tennessee massage licensure board.

The board shall be composed of seven (7) members who are residents of the state. Except for the two (2) citizen members, each member shall have at least five (5) years current experience in the practice of massage. Persons with a conflict of interest are ineligible for membership on the board.

All members shall be appointed by the governor. Initial appointments to the board shall be as follows:

Three (3) members shall serve terms of one (1) year; and

Four (4) members shall serve terms of two (2) years.

Except for two (2) members who shall be citizen members with no direct or indirect financial interest in massage, all board members shall be duly licensed or eligible to be licensed by the board.

Notwithstanding § 3-6-304 or any other law to the contrary, and in addition to all other requirements for membership on the board:

Any person registered as a lobbyist pursuant to the registration requirements of title 3, chapter 6 who is subsequently appointed or otherwise named as a member of the board shall terminate all employment and business association as a lobbyist with any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the board, prior to serving as a member of the board. This subdivision (e)(1)(A) shall apply to all persons appointed or otherwise named to the board after July 1, 2010;

No person who is a member of the board shall be permitted to register or otherwise serve as a lobbyist pursuant to title 3, chapter 6 for any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the board during such person's period of service as a member of the board. This subdivision (e)(1)(B) shall apply to all persons appointed or otherwise named to the board after July 1, 2010, and to all persons serving on the board on such date who are not registered as lobbyists; and

No person who serves as a member of the board shall be employed as a lobbyist by any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the board for one (1) year following the date such person's service on the board ends. This subdivision (e)(1)(C) shall apply to persons serving on the board as of July 1, 2010, and to persons appointed to the board subsequent to such date.

A person who violates this subsection (e) shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in title 3, chapter 6.

The bureau of ethics and campaign finance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this subsection (e). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and in accordance with the procedure for initiating and proposing rules by the ethics commission to the bureau of ethics and campaign finance as prescribed in § 4-55-103.

Subsequent appointees to the board shall have the professional qualifications required by their predecessors and shall be appointed to five-year terms. Each member shall serve until such member's successor is appointed and qualified, unless such board member is no longer competently performing the duties of office. Any vacancy on the board shall be filled by the governor for the balance of the unexpired term. The governor may remove members of the board from office for cause.

For each day engaged in the business of the board, a member shall receive as compensation one hundred dollars ($100) and shall also receive actual expenses to be paid in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The members of the board shall elect annually a chair and a secretary/treasurer.

The board shall meet as frequently as shall be reasonably necessary to implement this chapter. Four (4) or more members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting board business.

For administrative purposes, the board shall be attached to the division of health related boards as defined in § 68-1-101, referred to as “division” in this chapter, which shall supply support.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 4; T.C.A. § 63-18-203; Acts 2004, ch. 729, § 2; 2008, ch. 801, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 997, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. The massage licensure board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Acts 2008, ch. 801, § 4 provided that the act, which changed the amount of experience required for board members from three (3) years to (5) five years and changed the length of terms for subsequent board members from two-year terms to five-year terms, shall apply to members of the massage licensure board serving on April 23, 2008.

Acts 2010, ch. 997, § 5 provided that the provisions of the act prohibiting citizens who have a direct or indirect financial interest in massage from serving on the board shall apply to all citizen member appointments made to the board after July 1, 2010.

63-18-104. License required.

Persons or massage establishments engaged in massage for compensation shall be licensed by the massage licensure board.

Any person or establishment who advertises or engages in massage for compensation without a current valid license from the massage licensure board commits a Class B misdemeanor. It is unlawful to use the word “massage” or any other term that implies massage technique or method when advertising a service by a person who is not licensed under this chapter or another chapter of state law.

The practice of reflexology shall not be subject to the licensure requirements of this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter, “reflexology” means the application of specific pressures to reflex points in the hands and feet only.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 5; 2000, ch. 676, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-18-104; Acts 2005, ch. 232, § 3.

Cross-References. Licensure, § 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, recovery, § 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-18-105. License requirements — Issuance.

The board shall establish procedures and criteria for the issuance of licenses to persons and establishments engaged in massage for compensation.

No person or establishment shall be issued a license until the applicant and each person engaged in massage at such massage establishment has provided evidence satisfactory to the board that:

The applicant is eighteen (18) years of age or older;

The applicant has not been convicted of the offense of prostitution or sexual misconduct;

The applicant has:

Successfully completed the curriculum or curricula of one (1) or more post-secondary academic institutions for massage, bodywork or somatic therapy as defined by board regulations, totaling five hundred (500) hours or more, such institutions being approved by the board pursuant to § 63-18-115, and either authorized by the Tennessee higher education commission, or its equivalent in other states, or approved, or under the governance of, the Tennessee board of regents;

Received a passing score on a competency examination approved by the board;

Any person who has completed a program of study as required by subdivision (b)(3)(A) in a post-secondary academic institution located in Tennessee and receives a diploma or certificate prior to September 1, 2005, shall be issued a license without completing the examination requirement of this section;

Any person who meets the requirements of subdivision (b)(3)(C)(i) shall have until January 1, 2006, to apply for such a license;

Persons licensed under this subdivision (b)(3)(C) shall not be considered to have national certification and shall not hold themselves out to be nationally certified; and

All required fees have been paid.

Notwithstanding the requirements of this part, no establishment license is required for the office of a physician licensed under chapter 4, 6, or 9 of this title if a massage for compensation is provided within that office by a licensed massage therapist.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 6; 1996, ch. 1059, § 2; 1997, ch. 51, § 1; 1997, ch. 475, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 251, § 1; 2003, ch. 137, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-18-205; Acts 2004, ch. 729, § 3; 2005, ch. 232, §§ 1, 4; 2006, ch. 737, § 1; 2019, ch. 357, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 357, § 2. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Licensure, § 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-18-106. Investigation — Inspection — Revocation of license.

In order to effectuate this chapter, the board or its authorized representative is empowered to conduct an investigation of persons engaged in massage or massage establishments and to inspect the license of practitioners and establishments for compliance. The refusal of a practitioner or establishment to permit inspections shall be grounds for revocation, suspension or refusal to issue a license pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 7; T.C.A. § 63-18-206.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Licensure, § 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-18-107. Enjoining violation.

The board has the power and authority to enter into any court of this state having proper jurisdiction to seek an injunction against any person or massage establishment not in compliance with this chapter and is further empowered to enter into any such court to enforce this chapter in order to ensure compliance with such provisions.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 8; T.C.A. § 63-18-207.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

63-18-108. Grounds for denial, revocation, or suspension of license or other discipline.

The board is authorized to deny, restrict or condition any application for licensure or revoke, suspend or otherwise discipline the license of a massage therapist or an establishment, if the applicant, licensee or holder of an establishment license upon proof:

Is guilty of fraud in the practice of massage or fraud or deceit in the licensee's admission to the practice of massage;

Has been convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction of an offense that constitutes a felony or a misdemeanor under the laws of this state;

Is engaged in the practice of massage under a false or assumed name or is impersonating another practitioner of a like or different name;

Abuses or is addicted to the habitual use of intoxicating liquors, drugs or stimulants to such an extent as to incapacitate such person's performance of professional duties;

Is guilty of fraudulent, false, misleading or deceptive advertising or for prescribing medicines or drugs or practicing any licensed profession without legal authority. The licensee may not diagnose or imply or advertise, in any way, services for a condition that would require a diagnosis;

Is guilty of willful negligence in the practice of massage or has been guilty of employing, allowing or permitting any unlicensed person to perform massage in such licensee's establishment;

Has violated this chapter or any substantive rule promulgated under the authority of this chapter;

Has been convicted of sexual misconduct, assignation or the solicitation or attempt thereof;

Has violated or attempted to violate, directly or indirectly, or has assisted in or abetted the violation of, or conspired to violate, any provision of this chapter or any lawful order of the board issued pursuant to this chapter;

Has practiced as a licensed massage therapist in an unlicensed massage establishment;

Is mentally incompetent; or

Is guilty of unethical or unprofessional conduct.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 9; 2003, ch. 137, § 2; T.C.A. § 63-18-202; Acts 2006, ch. 737, §§ 2, 3; 2010, ch. 871, §§ 1-4; 2018, ch. 745, § 35.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

63-18-109. Accusation — Hearing.

Charges relative to a violation of this chapter may be presented by any person, or the board may, on its own motion, direct the chair of the board to present charges. An accusation may be filed with the chair of the board, charging any licensed massage therapist with any of the offenses enumerated in § 63-18-108.

The board shall provide an applicant denied issuance of a license or a practitioner whose license is suspended, revoked or not renewed a hearing on such suspension, revocation or nonrenewal, which hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Upon a decision of the board to refuse to issue, revoke or not to renew a license, the practitioner or establishment shall be prohibited from engaging in massage until the board's decision is overturned.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 10; T.C.A. § 63-18-209.

63-18-110. Exemptions.

Any person granted an exemption under this chapter is effective only to the extent that the bona fide practice of the profession or business that is licensed, certified or registered under the laws of this state overlaps into the field comprehended by this chapter, and exemptions under this chapter are only for those activities that are performed in the course of the bona fide practice of the business or profession of the person exempted.

Persons exempt under subsection (a) include, but are not limited to any branch of medicine, nursing, osteopathy, chiropractic, podiatry, and also barbers, cosmetologists, athletic trainers, physical and occupational therapists and any student of an institution described in § 63-18-105(b)(3)(A) or public school of this state; provided, that the student does not hold out as a licensed massage therapist and does not receive compensation for massage.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to massage therapists licensed in other states or countries or meeting standards set forward in § 63-18-105 when providing educational programs or services for a period of time not to exceed thirty (30) days within a calendar year.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 11; T.C.A. § 63-18-210; Acts 2005, ch. 232, § 2.

63-18-111. Authorization to promulgate rules, regulations and fees.

The board is hereby authorized to promulgate, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, such rules and regulations as are necessary to implement this chapter.

The board may adopt reasonable rules and regulations regarding personal cleanliness of massage therapists and the sanitary condition of towels, linens, creams, lotions, oils and other materials, facilities and equipment used in the practice of massage.

All fees for licensure, renewal of licensure and all other related matters shall be set by the board.

All education and other requirements for licensure in this chapter shall be set by the board.

The board may adopt rules and regulations for ethics.

All continuing education and other requirements for renewal of licensure not enumerated in this chapter shall be set by the board.

The board is authorized to set an application fee for all continuing education courses submitted to the board for approval.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 12; 1996, ch. 1059, § 3; T.C.A. § 63-18-211; Acts 2008, ch. 801, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 801, § 4 provided that the act, which added subsection (g), shall apply to members of the massage licensure board serving on April 23, 2008.

63-18-112. Reciprocity.

The board may, at its discretion, grant licensure to any person who is licensed or registered in another state or country with standards as stringent as those required by this chapter.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 13; T.C.A. § 63-18-212.

63-18-113. Tax.

Notwithstanding law to the contrary, the act of a duly licensed massage therapist in performing a massage shall be deemed to be medically therapeutic in nature and shall not be subject to the collection of any form of state or local taxation regulations not also imposed on other medically therapeutic activities. Additionally, a massage performed on or before October 1, 1995, by a person who becomes licensed in accordance with this chapter shall also not be subject to the collection of any form of state or local tax not also imposed on other medically therapeutic activities.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 14; 1996, ch. 1059, § 4; T.C.A. § 63-18-213.

63-18-114. Massage therapists are not primary care providers.

No person licensed by the massage licensure board shall ever be referred to as a primary care provider nor be permitted to use such designation.

Acts 1995, ch. 480, § 15; T.C.A. § 63-18-214.

63-18-115. Powers and duties of the board.

In addition to the powers and duties granted to or imposed upon it by other provisions of this chapter, the board shall have the following powers and duties:

Prescribe the minimum curricular and minimum standards for schools of massage therapy and for courses of training that prepare individuals for licensure under this chapter;

Approve such schools and courses as meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board;

Issue certificates of approval to such schools and courses that meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board;

Conduct hearings for disciplinary action against schools or courses that fail to meet the minimum requirements of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board; and

Annually publish passage rates for each school of massage therapy, based upon the results of each student's success in taking a national examination approved by the board. Schools that fail to achieve an overall passing rate of seventy percent (70%) shall be required to submit a remedial plan to be approved by the board.

Acts 2004, ch. 729, § 1; 2005, ch. 232, § 5.

63-18-116. Authority to issue license — Qualifications — Rules and regulations.

The board is authorized to issue a license to practice massage therapy to an applicant who:

Meets the qualifications set forth in § 63-18-105(b)(1) and (2); and

Has been certified by the National Certification Board for Therapeutic Massage and Bodywork for the five-year period immediately preceding application for licensure and can submit documentation satisfactory to the board that the applicant has engaged in the practice of massage therapy in another state for the five-year period immediately preceding application for licensure, and who either:

Has met the qualifications set forth in § 63-18-105(b)(3), but is unable, because the educational institution either was not state approved or is no longer in existence, to produce a transcript to document compliance; or

Graduated from a qualified massage school or course prior to October 1, 1995.

The board is authorized to promulgate rules that are necessary to effectuate this section.

Acts 2006, ch. 737, § 4.